th: รวมอุปกรณ์เทเธอร์บอล: เชือก; เทเธอร์บอล; เสาเทเธอร์บอล; อื่นๆ
fr: Équipement de spirobole inclus: Corde; Spirobole; Poteaux de spirobole; Autre
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός tetherball: Σχοινί; Tetherball; κοντάρι Tetherball; Άλλο
ko: 테더볼 장비 포함: 로프; 테더볼; 테더볼 장대; 기타
ru: Состав набора инвентаря для тетербола: Жгут; Тетербол; Стойка для тетербола; Другой
fi: Mukana salkopallovarusteet: Köysi; Salkopallo; Salkopallotolppa; Muu
en: Tetherball equipment included: Rope; Tetherball; Tetherball pole; Other
cs: Obsažené tetherbalové vybavení: Lano; Tetherball; Stožár na tetherball; Jiné
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinanti teterbolo įranga: Virvė; Teterbolas; Teterbolo stulpas; Kita
pt-BR: Equipamento de espirobol incluído: Corda; Espirobol; Mastro de espirobol; Outro
ro-RO: Echipament de tetherball inclus: Frânghie; Tetherball; Stâlp pentru tetherball; Altele
hr-HR: Uključena oprema za tetherball: Uže; Tetherball; Stup za tetherball; Ostalo
vi: Bao gồm thiết bị Tetherball: Dây thừng; Tetherball; Cột tetherball; Khác
zh-TW: 包括梨球設備: 繩索; 梨球; 繩球桿; 其他
nb: Smashballustyr inkludert: Tau; Smashball; Smashballstang; Annet
nl: Tetherballuitrusting inbegrepen: Touw; Tetherbal; Tetherbalpaal; Andere
pt-PT: Equipamento de Tetherball incluído: Corda; Tetherball; Poste de Tetherball; Outro
es: Equipo de tetherball incluido: Soga; Espirobol; Poste para espirobol; Otros
bg-BG: Включено оборудване за тетърбол: Въже; Тетърбол; Пилон за тетърбол; Други
it: Attrezzatura da tetherball inclusa: Corda; Tetherball; Palo da tetherball; Altro
zh-CN: 包含绳球装备: 绳索; 绳球; 绳球立柱; 其他
de: Tetherball-Ausrüstung inklusive: Seil; Tetherball; Tetherball-Stange; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Vrátane tetherballového vybavenia: Lano; Tetherball; Tetherballová tyč; Iné
tr: Tetherball ekipmanları dahil: Halat; Tetherball; Tetherball direği; Diğer
da: Stangtennisudstyr medfølger: Reb; Stangtennis; Stangtennispæl; Andet
hu: Mellékelt tetherball-felszerelés: Kötél; Tetherball; Tetherball-oszlop; Egyéb
ja: テザーボール装置付属: ロープ; テザーボール; テザーボール用ポール; その他
sv: Smashball-utrustning som ingår: Rep; Tetherball; Tetherballstolpe; Övrigt
pl: Sprzęt do gry w piłkę na uwięzi w zestawie: Lina; Piłka uwięziowa; Słupek tetherball; Inne
sl-SI: Priložena oprema za tetherball: Vrv; Žoga; Drog; Drugo